Washington statutes.
RCW 12.40.050

Requisites of claim.

A claim filed in the small claims department shall contain: (1) The name and address of the plaintiff; (2) a sworn statement, in brief and concise form, of the nature and amount of the claim and when the claim accrued; and (3) the name and residence of the defendant, if known to the plaintiff, for the purpose of serving the notice of claim on the defendant.

[ 2019 c 251 s 4; 1984 c 258 s 62; 1919 c 187 s 5; RRS s 1777-5.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.